Washington statutes.
RCW 26.04.140

Marriage license.

Before any persons can be joined in marriage, they shall procure a license from a county auditor, as provided in RCW 26.04.150 through 26.04.190.

[ 1985 c 82 s 1; 1939 c 204 s 2; RRS s 8450-1. Prior: Code 1881 s 2390; 1866 p 83 s 12.]